Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-667
Medical records; classification.

Medical records provided to the department for use in its medical record and health information registries shall be classified for release according to the following categories:

(1) Class I data shall be confidential with release only in aggregate data reports created by the department on a periodic basis, usually specified in the statutes creating the registry. These reports shall be public documents;

(2) Class II data shall be confidential with release only in aggregate data reports created by the department at the request of an individual. These reports shall be public documents;

(3) Class III data shall be confidential with release of patient-identifying data to approved researchers for specific research projects. The approved researcher shall maintain the confidentiality of the information; and

(4) Class IV data shall be confidential with release of case-specific data to approved researchers for specific research projects. The approved researcher shall maintain the confidentiality of the data.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 5.